California statutes. Unemployment Insurance Code
(6) Develop high road, as defined in subdivision (r) of Section 14005, jobs and career ladders for workers with demonstrated wage progression and demonstrate high road training partnership, as defined in subdivision (s) of Section 14005, standards to ensure job quality.

(7) Promote the retention and expansion of the state’s manufacturing workforce.

(8) Promote the hiring, training, and
 advancement of disadvantaged, marginalized, and underrepresented workers.

(c) The program established through this chapter is to be coordinated with all existing employment training programs and economic development programs, including, but not limited to, programs such as the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 3101 et seq.), the California Community Colleges, the regional occupational programs, vocational education programs, joint labor-management training programs, and related programs under the Employment Development Department, the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development, the California Housing and Homelessness Agency, and the Business and Consumer Services Agency.

(d) Projects funded under this chapter may include programs to provide training through apprenticeship programs that are registered with the Division of Apprenticeship Standards.

(e) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall become operative on July 1, 2026.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 28, Sec. 102.   (SB 170)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

10201.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Department” means the Employment Development Department.

(b) “Employer” or “eligible employer” means any employer subject to Part 1 (commencing with Section 100) of Division 1, except any public entity, or any nonprofit organization which has elected an alternate method of financing its liability for unemployment insurance compensation benefits pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 801), or Article 6 (commencing with Section 821) of Chapter 3.

Any public entity or nonprofit organization that has elected an alternate method
 of financing its liability for unemployment insurance compensation benefits pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 801), or Article 6 (commencing with Section 821) of Chapter 3, shall be deemed to be an employer only for purposes of placement of new hire trainees who received training as an incidental part of a training project designed to meet the needs of one or more private sector employers.

(c) “Eligible participant” means any person who, prior to beginning training or employment pursuant to this chapter, is any of the following:

(1) Unemployed and has established an unemployment insurance claim in this state, or has exhausted eligibility for unemployment insurance benefits from this state within the previous 24 months.

(2) Employed for a minimum of 90 days by his or her employer, or if employed for less than 90 days, met the conditions of paragraph (1) at the time of hire, had received a notice of layoff from the prior employer, or was employed by an employer for a period of not less than 90 days during the 180-day period prior to the employee’s current employment at the start of training with an eligible employer, as provided in subdivision (b). The panel may waive this requirement for trainees employed by a business locating or expanding operations in the state, provided it is part of a state and local economic development effort endeavoring to create or retain California jobs. The panel may also waive the requirement for up to 10 percent of the trainee population, if it determines a business meets standard funding requirements set out under subdivision (a) of Section 10200.

(d) “Executive director” means the executive director appointed pursuant to Section 10202.

(e) “Fund” means the Employment Training Fund created by Section 1610.

(f) “Job” means employment on a basis customarily considered full time for the occupation and industry. The employment shall have definite career potential and a substantial likelihood of providing long-term job security, with reportable California earnings during the employment retention period. Furthermore, the employment shall provide earnings, upon completion of the employment requirement specified in subdivision (f) of Section 10209, equal to 50 percent, in the case of new hire training, or 60 percent, in the case of retraining, of the state or regional average
 hourly wage. However, in no case shall the employment result in earnings of less than 45 percent of the state average hourly wage for new hire training and 55 percent of the state average hourly wage for retraining. The panel may consider the dollar value of health benefits that are voluntarily paid for by an employer when computing earnings to meet the minimum wage requirements.

(g) “New hire training” means employment training, including job-related literacy training, including soft skills,
 for persons who, at the start of training, are unemployed.

(h) “Panel” means the Employment Training Panel created by Section 10202.

(i) “Retraining” means employment-related skills and literacy training, including soft skills, for persons who are employed and who meet the definition of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) prior to commencement of training and will continue to be employed by the same employer for at least 90 days following completion of training.

(j) “Soft skills” means behaviors and competencies to allow people to navigate professional environments, work well with colleagues, and perform up to standards for professional success, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Social skills, including, but not limited to, respectful personal interactions, context appropriate behavior, and conflict resolution.

(2) Competency in oral, written, nonverbal, and listening skills.

(3) Problem solving, critical thinking, and
 decisionmaking skills, including, but not limited to, identifying issues and evaluating options in order to reach a reasonable conclusion.

(4) Self-regulation of behavior and the exercise of delayed gratification or directing focus or attention, or both.

(k) “State average hourly wage” means the average weekly wage paid by employers to employees covered by unemployment insurance, as reported to the Employment Development Department for the four calendar quarters ending June 30 of the preceding calendar year, divided by 40 hours.

(l) “Trainee” means an eligible participant.

(m) “Training agency” means any private training entity or local educational
 agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 216, Sec. 2.   (AB 2420)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10201.5.

With respect to funding appropriated in the annual Budget Act to the Employment Development Department for allocation by the Employment Training Panel and identified for training of workers in regions suffering from high unemployment and low job creation or regions identified in a proclamation of a state of emergency issued by the Governor under the California Emergency Services Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the panel, notwithstanding subdivision (f) of Section 10201, may waive the minimum wage requirements included in that subdivision provided that the post-retention wage of each trainee who has completed training and the required training period exceeds his or her wage before and during training.
 This determination shall be made on a case-by-case basis to ensure that post-training improvements in earnings are sufficient to warrant the investment of public funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 3, Sec. 6.   (SB 104)   Effective March 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10202.

(a) The Employment Training Panel is established in the Employment Development Department.

(b) The executive director shall be appointed by the Governor, and shall be well qualified for the position with experience in government. The executive director may perform all duties, exercise all powers, discharge all responsibilities, and administer and enforce all laws, rules, and regulations under the jurisdiction of the panel, with the approval of the panel. The executive director shall administer this chapter, with the approval of the panel, in the manner he or she deems necessary to conduct the work of the panel properly. With the approval of the panel, the executive director may create divisions and subdivisions as necessary, and change and abolish these divisions and subdivisions from time to time.

(c) The panel may employ personnel necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. All personnel shall be appointed pursuant to the State Civil Service Act (Part 1 (commencing with Section 18000) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code), except for an executive director, and two assistant directors, who shall be exempt from state civil service.

(d) All personnel of the panel shall be appointed, directed, and controlled only by the panel or its authorized deputies or agents to whom it may delegate its powers.

(e) The Governor shall appoint two assistant directors, to serve at the pleasure of the Governor. The assistant directors shall have the duties as assigned by the executive director, and shall be responsible to the executive director for the performance of their duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 497, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10202.5.

(a) The panel shall consist of eight persons, seven of whom shall be appointed as provided in subdivision (b), and shall have experience and a demonstrated interest in business management and employment relations. The Director of the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development, or his or her designee, shall also serve on the panel as an ex officio, voting member.

(b) (1) Two members of the panel shall be appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly. One of those members shall be a private sector labor representative and the other member shall be a business representative.

(2) Two members of the panel shall be appointed by the President pro Tempore of the Senate. One of
 those members shall be a private sector labor representative and the other member shall be a business representative.

(3) Three members of the panel shall be appointed by the Governor. One of those members shall be a private sector labor representative, one member shall be a business representative, and one member shall be a public member.

(4) Labor appointments shall be made from nominations from state labor federations. Business appointments shall be made from nominations from state business organizations and business trade associations.

(5) The Governor shall designate a member to chair the panel, and the person so designated shall serve as the chair of the panel at the pleasure of the Governor.

(c) The appointive members of the
 panel, except members appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly, shall serve for two-year terms. The appointive members of the panel appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly shall serve at the pleasure of the Speaker of the Assembly.

(d) Appointive members of the panel shall receive the necessary traveling and other expenses incurred by them in the performance of their official duties out of appropriations made for the support of the panel. In addition, each appointive member of the panel shall receive one hundred dollars ($100) for each day attending meetings of the panel, and may receive one hundred dollars ($100) for each day spent conducting other official business of the panel, but not exceeding a maximum of three hundred dollars ($300) per month.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 43, Sec. 6.   (AB 1831)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

10203.

The panel may meet as necessary at locations throughout the state. The panel shall maintain a minimum of three regional offices. The central office shall be located in Sacramento. Two regional offices shall be located in the southern part of the state, and one regional office shall be located in the northern part of the state.

The executive director will assign one person, with experience in meeting the needs of small businesses, to each of the regional offices for the purpose of developing training projects for small businesses and expediting the processing of training proposals from small businesses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 491, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10204.

The panel shall coordinate its programs with local and state workforce development boards and other partners of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 3101 et seq.). This coordination shall include, but not be limited to, the adoption of a plan, including regular sharing of data, for the coordination of training authorized pursuant to this chapter with
 programs administered under Division 8 (commencing with Section 15000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 133, Sec. 4.   (AB 1766)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10205.

The panel shall do all of the following:

(a) Establish a three-year plan that shall be updated annually, based on the demand of employers for trained workers, changes in the state’s economy and labor markets, and continuous reviews of the effectiveness of panel training contracts. The updated plan shall be submitted to the Governor and the Legislature not later than January 1 of each year. In carrying out this section, the panel shall review information in the following areas:

(1) Labor market information, including the state-local labor market information program in the Employment Development Department and other relevant regional or statewide
 initiatives and collaboratives.

(2) Evaluations of the effectiveness of training as measured by increased security of employment for workers and benefits to the California economy.

(3) The demand for training by industry, type of training, and size of employer.

(4) Changes in skills necessary to perform jobs, including changes in basic literacy skills.

(5) Changes in the demographics of the labor force and the population entering the labor market.

(6) Proposed expenditures by other agencies of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 3101 et seq.) funds
 and other state and federal training and vocational education funds on eligible participants.

(b) Maintain a system to continuously monitor economic and other data required under this plan. If this data changes significantly during the life of the plan, the plan shall be amended by the panel. Each plan shall include all of the following:

(1) The panel’s objectives with respect to the criteria and priorities specified in Section 10200 and the distribution of funds between new-hire training and retraining.

(2) The identification of specific industries, production and quality control techniques, and regions of the state where employment training funds would most benefit the state’s economy and plans to encourage training in
 these areas, including specific standards and a system for expedited review of proposals that meet the standards.

(3) A system for expedited review of proposals that are substantially similar with respect to employer needs, training curriculum, duration of training, and costs of training, in order to encourage the development of proposals that meet the needs identified in paragraph (2).

(4) The panel’s goals, operational objectives, and strategies to meet the needs of small businesses, including, but not limited to, those small businesses with 100 or fewer employees. These strategies proposed by the panel may include, but not be limited to, pilot demonstration projects designed to identify potential barriers that small businesses may experience in accessing panel programs
 and workforce training resources, including barriers that may exist within small businesses.

(5) The research objectives of the panel that contribute to the effectiveness of this chapter in benefiting the economy of the state as a whole.

(6) A priority list of skills or occupations that are in such short supply that employers are choosing to not locate or expand their businesses in the state or are importing labor in response to these skills shortages.

(7) A review of the panel’s efforts to coordinate with the California Workforce Development Board and local boards to achieve an effective and coordinated approach in the delivery of the state’s workforce resources.

(A) The panel will consider specific strategies to achieve this goal that include the development of initiatives to engage local workforce development boards in enhancing the utilization of panel training resources by companies in priority sectors, special populations, and in geographically underserved areas of the state.

(B) Various approaches to foster greater program integration between workforce development boards and the panel will also be considered, which may include marketing agreements, expanded technical assistance, modification of program regulations and policy, and expanded use of multiple employer contracts.

(c) Solicit proposals and write contracts on the basis of proposals made directly to it. Contracts for the purpose of providing employment training may be
 written with any of the following:

(1) An employer or group of employers.

(2) A training agency.

(3) A local workforce development board with the approval of the appropriate local elected officials in the local workforce development area.

(4) A grant recipient or administrative entity selected pursuant to the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 3101 et seq.), with the approval of the local workforce development board and the appropriate local elected officials.

These contracts shall be in the form of fixed-fee performance contracts. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
 contrary, contracts entered into pursuant to this chapter shall not be subject to competitive bidding procedures. Contracts for training may be written for a period not to exceed 24 months for the purpose of administration by the panel and the contracting employer or any group of employers acting jointly or any training agency for the purpose of providing employment training.

(d) Fund training projects that best meet the priorities identified annually. In doing so, the panel shall seek to facilitate the employment of the maximum number of eligible participants.

(e) (1) Establish minimum standards for the consideration of proposals, which shall include, but not be limited
 to:

(A) Evidence of labor market demand.

(B) The number of jobs available.

(C) The skill requirements for the identified jobs.

(D) The projected cost per person trained, hired, and retained in employment.

(E) The wages and amount of fringe benefits paid to successful trainees upon placement.

(F) An attestation of compliance with all state and federal labor and health and safety laws.

(G) The curriculum for the training.

(2) (A) No proposal shall be considered or approved that proposes training for employment covered by a collective bargaining agreement unless the signatory labor organization agrees in writing.

(B) No proposal shall be considered or approved if an applicant is ineligible to bid, be awarded, or subcontract on a public works project pursuant to Section 1777.1 or 1777.7 of the Labor Code.

(C) All applicants shall include in their application an attestation affirming the
 applicant does not have a final determination, order, judgment, or award has been issued against an applicant for violations of labor law that remain unabated or unsatisfied following the period during which an appeal may be made. No proposal shall be considered or approved if an applicant fails to include this attestation.

(f) Ensure the provision of adequate fiscal and accounting controls for, monitoring and auditing of, and other appropriate technical and administrative assistance to, projects funded by this chapter.

(g) Provide for evaluation of
 projects funded by this chapter. The evaluations shall assess the effectiveness of training previously funded by the panel to improve job security and stability for workers, and benefit participating employers and the state’s economy, and shall compare the wages of trainees in the 12-month period prior to training as well as the 12-month period subsequent to completion of training, as reflected in the department’s unemployment insurance tax records. Individual project evaluations shall contain a summary description of the project, the number of persons entering training, the number of persons completing training, the number of persons employed at the end of the project, the number of persons still employed three months after the end of the project, the wages paid, the total costs of the project, and the total reimbursement received from the Employment Training Fund.

(h) Report annually to the Legislature, by November 30, on projects operating during the previous state fiscal year. These annual reports shall provide separate summaries of all of the following:

(1) Projects completed during the year, including their individual and aggregate performance and cost.

(2) Projects not completed during the year, briefly describing each project and identifying approved contract amounts by contract and for this category as a whole, and identifying any projects in which funds are expected to be disencumbered.

(3) Projects terminated prior to completion and the reasons for the termination.

(4) A description of the amount, type, and effectiveness of literacy training funded by the panel.

(5) Results of complete project evaluations.

(6) A description of pilot projects, and the strategies that were identified through these projects, to increase access by small businesses to panel training contracts.

(7) A listing of training projects that were funded in high unemployment areas and a detailed description of the policies and procedures that were used to designate geographic regions and municipalities as high unemployment areas.

In addition, based upon its experience in administering job training projects, the panel shall include in these reports policy recommendations
 concerning the impact of job training and the panel’s program on economic development, labor-management relations, employment security, and other related issues.

(i) Conduct ongoing reviews of panel policies with the goal of developing an improved process for developing, funding, and implementing panel contracts as described in this chapter.

(j) Expedite the processing of contracts for firms considering locating or expanding businesses in the state, in accordance with the priorities for employment training programs set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 10200.

(k) Coordinate and consult regularly with business groups and labor organizations, the California Workforce Development Board, the State Department of Education, the
 office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, and the Employment Development Department.

(l) Adopt by regulation procedures for the conduct of panel business, including the scheduling and conduct of meetings, the review of proposals, the disclosure of contacts between panel members and parties at interest concerning particular proposals, contracts, or cases before the panel or its staff, the awarding of contracts, the administration of contracts, and the payment of amounts due to contractors. All decisions by the panel shall be made by resolution of the panel and any adverse decision shall include a statement of the reason for the decision.

(m) Provide a regularly updated list, at least every 60 days, and make the list available to the public, of all applicants that have submitted applications.

(n) Adopt regulations and procedures providing reasonable confidentiality for the proprietary information of employers seeking training funds from the panel if the public disclosure of that information would result in an unfair competitive disadvantage to the employer supplying the information. The panel shall not withhold information from the public regarding its operations, procedures, and decisions that would otherwise be subject to disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(o) Review and comment on the budget and performance of any program, project, or activity funded by the panel utilizing funds collected pursuant to Section 976.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 469, Sec. 2.   (SB 1321)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10206.

(a) The panel may allocate money in the fund for any of the following purposes:

(1) Reimbursement of reasonable training costs, and administrative costs incurred by contractors. In making a determination of costs to be reimbursed under this paragraph, the panel may allocate funds in accordance with any of the following methods:

(A) For purposes of providing simplified fixed-fee performance contracts, a flat rate per hour for categories of training that are substantially similar with respect to content, methodology, and duration, as determined by the panel, not to exceed the reasonable and normal costs for the training. The panel shall periodically adjust the standardized rates established pursuant to this paragraph to reflect changes in training costs.

(B) A complete review of the proposal and its costs, including a budget listing the planned costs of training, including personnel, fringe benefits, equipment, supplies, fees for consulting or administrative services, and other costs attributable to training; the services provided by subcontractors; the length and complexity of the training; the method of training; the wages and occupations following training; whether the trainees are new hires or retrainees; and the cost of similar training that the panel has funded previously. The cost of administration shall not exceed 15 percent of the training costs under this paragraph, except that for new hire training the panel may fund administrative costs of up to 25 percent of the training cost.

(C) The panel may modify the specific requirements of this paragraph as they apply to employers or contractors proposing projects that involve training for a significant number of small employers in the same project.

(D) A contractor is prohibited from utilizing any funds earned or paid as advances or progress payments for the purpose of making payments to any other individual or entity, either directly or indirectly, for costs incurred as a finder’s fee or for other compensation related to the predevelopment or development phase of a training program, which is based on a percentage of the preliminary or final panel award to the contractor for the training project.

(2) (A) Costs of program administration incurred under this chapter. These costs shall be reviewed annually by the Department of Finance and the Legislature and determined through the normal budgetary process.

(B) The panel’s administrative costs, exclusive of the cost of administering Section 976.6, shall not exceed 15 percent of the total amount annually appropriated for expenditure by the panel. Expenditures for marketing, research, and evaluations provided under the contract to the panel that otherwise would have been provided directly by the panel shall not be included in this limitation.

(3) Service related to the purposes of this chapter provided by the Small Business Development Centers.

(b) For all training contracts, the panel shall establish requirements for in-kind contributions by either the contractor or the employer that reflect a substantial commitment on the part of the contractor or the employer to the value of the training. In developing these requirements, the panel shall take into account the ability of the contractor or the employer, because of size or financial condition, to make any contribution, and the ability of the Employment Training Fund to meet the demand for training authorized by this chapter. In developing policies regarding in-kind contributions, the panel shall hold public hearings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 225, Sec. 72.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10207.

(a) The panel shall accept or reject a completed application within 60 days of the receipt by the executive director.

(b) The panel shall develop expedited procedures for reviewing proposals submitted by the state agencies which are participants in a special interagency agreement with the panel for purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 491, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10208.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to preclude any employer from contracting with any public or private training entity for services, subject to the approval of the panel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1074, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10209.

(a) Contracts shall only be made for training in job-related vocational skills that are necessary for participants to attain a new job or retain an existing job with definite career potential and long-term job security. The contracts for vocational skills training may include ancillary training for job-related basic and literacy skills training, including soft skills, if the panel finds that the training is necessary to
 achieve the objectives of the vocational training.

(b) The panel shall not approve any training proposal which facilitates the change in ownership of a business leading to the likelihood that an existing collective bargaining agreement would be declared void.

(c) To encourage a broad and equitable distribution of funds, the panel may require an employer who has previously received funds pursuant to this chapter for retraining of workers at a facility to contribute proportionately more to the cost of training in subsequent panel contracts for training of workers at the same facility.

(d) The panel may delegate to the executive director the authority to approve training contracts of up to one hundred thousand
 dollars ($100,000), provided the contracts meet the requirements of this chapter and the policies established by the panel, and provided that the panel regularly reviews the actions taken by the executive director pursuant to this subdivision.

(e) Payments shall be made in accordance with a performance contract under which partial payments may be made during training, a partial payment may be made on placement or retention of each trainee, and not less than 25 percent of the negotiated fee is withheld until the trainee has been retained in employment for 90 days after the end of training with a single employer, except for those occupations in which it is not customary for a worker to be employed 90 consecutive days with a single employer. In these latter cases, the panel may substitute a period similar to the probationary period customary to
 the occupation. The probationary period shall not be less than 500 work hours and shall be completed within 272 days of the completion of the training. In no case shall any payment be considered to have been earned until the trainee has been retained in employment for 90 days or the equivalent probationary period for an occupation in which it is not customary for a worker to be employed 90 consecutive days with a single employer.

(f) Contracts for new hire training shall require the contractor to provide the placement services necessary to ensure the trainees are placed in jobs for which they have been trained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 216, Sec. 3.   (AB 2420)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10210.

Contracts shall be made with training agencies only if the training agency can demonstrate all of the following:

(a) The training agency has a satisfactory record of past performance in the placement and retention of former trainees and employer satisfaction with former trainees.

(b) The training agency can demonstrate labor market demand for the proposed training. Proof shall include, but not be limited to, the documented need of specific employers for the workers proposed to be trained in the skills proposed by the training agency.

(c) The training agency can demonstrate that the training prepares trainees in a manner satisfactory to employers.

(d) The training agency can demonstrate that its accounting systems include controls adequate to check the accuracy and reliability of accounting data, promote operating efficiency, and assure compliance with government requirements and generally accepted accounting principles. The panel shall have full access at any time to these accounting systems to assure compliance with these standards.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1074, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10211.

A trainee or employee participating in a training program pursuant to this chapter shall be considered to be in a training program having the approval of the director under Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 1266) of Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1211, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10212.2.

The panel shall prepare a budget covering necessary administrative costs of the panel. The budget shall not be subject to change by the director except as agreed to by the panel. In the event that agreement cannot be reached, the Secretary of the Labor and Workforce Development Agency shall attempt to reach a mutual agreement. In the event a mutual agreement cannot be reached, the final decision shall rest with the Governor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 497, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10213.

The Employment Development Department shall cooperate with the panel by offering necessary technical assistance, which may include, but is not limited to, labor market information, projections of occupational demand, and information and advice on alternative training strategies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1074, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10214.

To assist the panel and the Legislature in assessing the impact of this chapter over an extended period of time, the Employment Development Department shall develop and maintain a continuous employment, wage, and benefit history of unemployment insurance participants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 497, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10214.5.

(a) The panel may allocate up to 15 percent of the annually available training funds for the purpose of funding special employment training projects that improve the skills and employment security of frontline workers, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 10200. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, participants in these projects are not required to meet the eligibility criteria set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 10200 or subdivision (c) of Section 10201.

(b) The panel shall, on an annual basis or as needed in response to a proclamation of a state of emergency issued by the Governor under the California Emergency Services Act (Chapter 7 (commencing
 with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code), identify industries and occupations that shall be priorities for funding under this section. Training shall be targeted, but not limited, to frontline workers who earn at least the state average hourly wage.

(c) The panel may waive the minimum wage provisions pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 10201 for projects in regions of the state where the unemployment rate is significantly higher than the state average or regions identified in a proclamation of a state of emergency issued by the Governor under the California Emergency Services Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and also may waive the employment retentions provisions specified in subdivision (f) of Section 10209 and instead require that the trainee has been
 retained in employment for a minimum of 90 days out of 120 consecutive days after the end of training with no more than three employers.

(d) (1) The panel may allocate funds pursuant to subdivision (a) to increase the productivity and extended employment retention of workers in the state’s major seasonal industries.

(2) In funding special employment training projects for this purpose, the panel may do all of the following:

(A) When the amount of the postretention wages of each trainee who has completed training exceeds the amount of wages that the trainee earned before and during training, waive the minimum wage requirements set forth in subdivision (f) of Section 10201.

(B) Waive the employment retention requirements set forth in subdivision (f) of Section 10209 and instead require that the trainee be retained in employment for not less than 500 hours within the
 12-month period following the completion of the training.

(C) When the panel finds that the training is necessary to achieve the objectives of vocational training, waive the limitation on job-related basic and literacy skills training, including soft skills, set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 10209.

(3) For purposes of this section, “major seasonal industries” means eligible employers who satisfy all of the following requirements:

(A) Have a workforce comprised of at least 50 percent of workers whose
 employment period is necessarily cyclical, including, but not limited to, businesses directly involved in the harvesting, packing, or processing of goods or products.

(B) Have retained at least 50 percent of the same seasonal employees for at least one season of not less than 500 hours for the preceding 12-month period.

(C) Pay wages and provide benefits that exceed industry averages.

(e) The panel shall adopt minimum standards for consideration of proposals to be funded pursuant to this section.

(f) The panel may select contracts funded under this section based on competitive bidding.

(g) It is
 the intent of the Legislature in providing the authority for these projects that the panel allocate these funds in a manner consistent with the objectives of this chapter as provided in Section 10200.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 216, Sec. 4.   (AB 2420)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10214.6.

(a) The panel shall develop and publish guidelines for the purpose of supporting and implementing one or more alternative fund programs to reimburse the cost of training consistent with the purposes of this part, using funds from a source other than the employment training tax. The alternative funds may be from any federal, state, or local governmental entity, as appropriated in statute or other means. The guidelines shall include adequate fiscal and accounting controls, as prescribed in subdivision (f) of Section 10205.

(b) The panel may adopt any regulations necessary to implement this section, but any regulations so adopted are exempt from the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of
 Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.
